Hawaii statutes.
[§27-43.5] Additional duties
of the chief information officer relating to security of government
information. (a) The chief information officer shall provide for periodic
security audits of all executive branch departments and agencies regarding the
protection of government information and data communication infrastructure.

(b) Security audits may include on-site audits
as well as reviews of all written security procedures and documented
practices. The chief information officer may contract with a private firm or
firms that specialize in conducting security audits; provided that information
protected from disclosure by federal or state law, including confidential tax
information, shall not be disclosed. All executive branch departments,
agencies, boards, or commissions subject to the security audits authorized by
this section shall fully cooperate with the entity designated to perform the
audit. The chief information officer may direct specific remedial actions to
mitigate findings of insufficient administrative, technical, and physical
controls necessary to protect state government information or data
communication infrastructure.

(c) This section shall not infringe upon
responsibilities assigned to the comptroller or the auditor by any state or federal
law. [L 2013, c 265, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next